Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2611
Agreements with federal authority; authorization.

The department shall be authorized to enter into agreements with the appropriate federal authority as provided by 23 U.S.C., relating to the control of junkyards in areas adjacent to the Highway Beautification Control System, and to take action in the name of the state to comply with the terms of such agreement.

Laws 1971, LB 398, § 11;

Laws 1995, LB 264, § 33.